Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-108
Reorganization; rights and privileges preserved.

When any city of the first class is declared a city of the primary class pursuant to section 15-102, all trusts, rights, and privileges of such city of the first class shall be transmitted to and be invested in such city of the primary class.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 8, p. 73;

R.S.1913, § 4411;

C.S.1922, § 3787;

C.S.1929, § 15-108;

R.S.1943, § 15-108;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 12.